utilities/dictionaries/fo_FO-Faroese.aff
FLAG num
#bulkatorv
SFX 381 N 6
SFX 381 0 torv .
SFX 381 0 torvi .
SFX 381 0 torvið .
SFX 381 0 torvinum .
SFX 381 0 torvs .
SFX 381 0 torvsins .

#akurull
SFX 382 N 6
SFX 382 0 ull .
SFX 382 0 ullar .
SFX 382 0 ullarinnar .
SFX 382 0 ullin .
SFX 382 0 ullina .
SFX 382 0 ullini .

#bilasøla
SFX 383 N 11
SFX 383 0 søla .
SFX 383 0 sølan .
SFX 383 0 sølanna .
SFX 383 0 sølu .
SFX 383 0 sølum .
SFX 383 0 søluna .
SFX 383 0 søluni .
SFX 383 0 sølunnar .
SFX 383 0 sølunum .
SFX 383 0 sølur .
SFX 383 0 sølurnar .

#barnagoymsla
SFX 384 N 11
SFX 384 0 goymsla .
SFX 384 0 goymslan .
SFX 384 0 goymslanna .
SFX 384 0 goymslu .
SFX 384 0 goymslum .
SFX 384 0 goymsluna .
SFX 384 0 goymsluni .
SFX 384 0 goymslunnar .
SFX 384 0 goymslunum .
SFX 384 0 goymslur .
SFX 384 0 goymslurnar .

#atkvøðuseðil
SFX 385 N 13
SFX 385 0 seðil .
SFX 385 0 seðilin .
SFX 385 0 seðils .
SFX 385 0 seðilsins .
SFX 385 0 seðla .
SFX 385 0 seðlanna .
SFX 385 0 seðlar .
SFX 385 0 seðlarnar .
SFX 385 0 seðlarnir .
SFX 385 0 seðli .
SFX 385 0 seðlinum .
SFX 385 0 seðlum .
SFX 385 0 seðlunum .

#aðalsøgn
SFX 386 N 14
SFX 386 0 sagna .
SFX 386 0 sagnanna .
SFX 386 0 sagnar .
SFX 386 0 sagnarinnar .
SFX 386 0 sagnir .
SFX 386 0 sagnirnar .
SFX 386 0 sagnum .
SFX 386 0 sagnunum .
SFX 386 0 søgn .
SFX 386 0 søgnin .
SFX 386 0 søgnina .
SFX 386 0 søgnini .
SFX 386 0 søgnum .
SFX 386 0 søgnunum .

#andvekursnátt
SFX 387 N 12
SFX 387 0 nætur .
SFX 387 0 næturnar .
SFX 387 0 nátt .
SFX 387 0 nátta .
SFX 387 0 náttanna .
SFX 387 0 náttar .
SFX 387 0 náttarinnar .
SFX 387 0 náttin .
SFX 387 0 náttina .
SFX 387 0 náttini .
SFX 387 0 náttum .
SFX 387 0 náttunum .

#altjóðarættur
SFX 388 N 8
SFX 388 0 rætt .
SFX 388 0 rættar .
SFX 388 0 rættarins .
SFX 388 0 rætti .
SFX 388 0 rættin .
SFX 388 0 rættinum .
SFX 388 0 rættur .
SFX 388 0 rætturin .

#blekkglas
SFX 389 N 11
SFX 389 0 glas .
SFX 389 0 glasa .
SFX 389 0 glasanna .
SFX 389 0 glasi .
SFX 389 0 glasið .
SFX 389 0 glasins .
SFX 389 0 glasinum .
SFX 389 0 gløs .
SFX 389 0 gløsini .
SFX 389 0 gløsum .
SFX 389 0 gløsunum .

#arr
SFX 390 N 10
SFX 390 r s .
SFX 390 r sins .
SFX 390 0 a .
SFX 390 0 anna .
SFX 390 0 i .
SFX 390 0 ið .
SFX 390 0 ini .
SFX 390 0 inum .
SFX 390 0 um .
SFX 390 0 unum .

#beriposi
SFX 391 N 12
SFX 391 0 posa .
SFX 391 0 posan .
SFX 391 0 posanna .
SFX 391 0 posans .
SFX 391 0 posanum .
SFX 391 0 posar .
SFX 391 0 posarnar .
SFX 391 0 posarnir .
SFX 391 0 posi .
SFX 391 0 posin .
SFX 391 0 posum .
SFX 391 0 posunum .

#atsmakkur
SFX 392 N 7
SFX 392 k s .
SFX 392 k sins .
SFX 392 0 i .
SFX 392 0 in .
SFX 392 0 inum .
SFX 392 0 ur .
SFX 392 0 urin .

#Áland
SFX 393 N 2
SFX 393 0 i .
SFX 393 0 s .

#eplanál
SFX 394 N 12
SFX 394 0 nál .
SFX 394 0 nála .
SFX 394 0 nálanna .
SFX 394 0 nálar .
SFX 394 0 nálarinnar .
SFX 394 0 nálin .
SFX 394 0 nálina .
SFX 394 0 nálini .
SFX 394 0 nálir .
SFX 394 0 nálirnar .
SFX 394 0 nálum .
SFX 394 0 nálunum .

#bertelva
SFX 395 N 10
SFX 395 d a .
SFX 395 d að .
SFX 395 d aði .
SFX 395 d aðu .
SFX 395 d ar .
SFX 395 d di .
SFX 395 d du .
SFX 395 d ir .
SFX 395 d t .
SFX 395 0 ur .

#ballsnøggur
SFX 396 N 8
SFX 396 g t .
SFX 396 0 a .
SFX 396 0 an .
SFX 396 0 ar .
SFX 396 0 ari .
SFX 396 0 ir .
SFX 396 0 um .
SFX 396 0 ur .

#bringufjøður
SFX 397 N 13
SFX 397 0 fjaðra .
SFX 397 0 fjaðranna .
SFX 397 0 fjaðrar .
SFX 397 0 fjaðrarinnar .
SFX 397 0 fjaðrarnar .
SFX 397 0 fjaðrum .
SFX 397 0 fjaðrunum .
SFX 397 0 fjøðrum .
SFX 397 0 fjøðrunum .
SFX 397 0 fjøður .
SFX 397 0 fjøðurin .
SFX 397 0 fjøðurina .
SFX 397 0 fjøðurini .

#aðalregla
SFX 398 N 11
SFX 398 0 regla .
SFX 398 0 reglan .
SFX 398 0 reglanna .
SFX 398 0 reglu .
SFX 398 0 reglum .
SFX 398 0 regluna .
SFX 398 0 regluni .
SFX 398 0 reglunnar .
SFX 398 0 reglunum .
SFX 398 0 reglur .
SFX 398 0 reglurnar .

#akslahædd
SFX 399 N 12
SFX 399 0 hædd .
SFX 399 0 hædda .
SFX 399 0 hæddanna .
SFX 399 0 hæddar .
SFX 399 0 hæddarinnar .
SFX 399 0 hæddin .
SFX 399 0 hæddina .
SFX 399 0 hæddini .
SFX 399 0 hæddir .
SFX 399 0 hæddirnar .
SFX 399 0 hæddum .
SFX 399 0 hæddunum .

#akslaypp
SFX 400 N 10
SFX 400 p s .
SFX 400 p sins .
SFX 400 0 a .
SFX 400 0 anna .
SFX 400 0 i .
SFX 400 0 ið .
SFX 400 0 ini .
SFX 400 0 inum .
SFX 400 0 um .
SFX 400 0 unum .

#aldalangur
SFX 401 N 9
SFX 401 0 langa .
SFX 401 0 langan .
SFX 401 0 langar .
SFX 401 0 langari .
SFX 401 0 langir .
SFX 401 0 langt .
SFX 401 0 langur .
SFX 401 0 long .
SFX 401 0 longum .

#barnalækni
SFX 402 N 12
SFX 402 0 lækna .
SFX 402 0 læknan .
SFX 402 0 læknanna .
SFX 402 0 læknans .
SFX 402 0 læknanum .
SFX 402 0 læknar .
SFX 402 0 læknarnar .
SFX 402 0 læknarnir .
SFX 402 0 lækni .
SFX 402 0 læknin .
SFX 402 0 læknum .
SFX 402 0 læknunum .

#aðalbláber
SFX 403 N 13
SFX 403 0 ber .
SFX 403 0 beri .
SFX 403 0 berið .
SFX 403 0 berini .
SFX 403 0 berinum .
SFX 403 0 berja .
SFX 403 0 berjanna .
SFX 403 0 berjum .
SFX 403 0 berjunum .
SFX 403 0 bers .
SFX 403 0 bersins .
SFX 403 0 berum .
SFX 403 0 berunum .

#arvalæra
SFX 404 N 6
SFX 404 0 læra .
SFX 404 0 læran .
SFX 404 0 læru .
SFX 404 0 læruna .
SFX 404 0 læruni .
SFX 404 0 lærunnar .

#breyðformur
SFX 405 N 15
SFX 405 0 form .
SFX 405 0 forma .
SFX 405 0 formanna .
SFX 405 0 formar .
SFX 405 0 formarnar .
SFX 405 0 formarnir .
SFX 405 0 formi .
SFX 405 0 formin .
SFX 405 0 forminum .
SFX 405 0 forms .
SFX 405 0 formsins .
SFX 405 0 formum .
SFX 405 0 formunum .
SFX 405 0 formur .
SFX 405 0 formurin .

#bráðfremja
SFX 406 N 2
SFX 406 0 ja .
SFX 406 0 ur .

#álitisstarv
SFX 407 N 12
SFX 407 0 starv .
SFX 407 0 starva .
SFX 407 0 starvanna .
SFX 407 0 starvi .
SFX 407 0 starvið .
SFX 407 0 starvinum .
SFX 407 0 starvs .
SFX 407 0 starvsins .
SFX 407 0 størv .
SFX 407 0 størvini .
SFX 407 0 størvum .
SFX 407 0 størvunum .

#afturkroppur
SFX 408 N 15
SFX 408 0 kropp .
SFX 408 0 kroppa .
SFX 408 0 kroppanna .
SFX 408 0 kroppar .
SFX 408 0 kropparnar .
SFX 408 0 kropparnir .
SFX 408 0 kroppi .
SFX 408 0 kroppin .
SFX 408 0 kroppinum .
SFX 408 0 kroppum .
SFX 408 0 kroppunum .
SFX 408 0 kroppur .
SFX 408 0 kroppurin .
SFX 408 0 krops .
SFX 408 0 kropsins .

#avsiga
SFX 409 N 1
SFX 409 0 du .

#avlýsing
SFX 410 N 11
SFX 410 0 lýsing .
SFX 410 0 lýsinga .
SFX 410 0 lýsinganna .
SFX 410 0 lýsingar .
SFX 410 0 lýsingarinnar .
SFX 410 0 lýsingarnar .
SFX 410 0 lýsingin .
SFX 410 0 lýsingina .
SFX 410 0 lýsingini .
SFX 410 0 lýsingum .
SFX 410 0 lýsingunum .

#ájáttilsi
SFX 411 N 11
SFX 411 0 ilsa .
SFX 411 0 ilsanna .
SFX 411 0 ilsi .
SFX 411 0 ilsið .
SFX 411 0 ilsini .
SFX 411 0 ilsinum .
SFX 411 0 ilsir .
SFX 411 0 ilsis .
SFX 411 0 ilsisins .
SFX 411 0 ilsum .
SFX 411 0 ilsunum .

#aksaskotin
SFX 412 N 8
SFX 412 0 skotið .
SFX 412 0 skotin .
SFX 412 0 skotna .
SFX 412 0 skotnan .
SFX 412 0 skotnar .
SFX 412 0 skotnari .
SFX 412 0 skotnir .
SFX 412 0 skotnum .

#bekkjaroyra
SFX 413 N 11
SFX 413 0 oyra .
SFX 413 0 oyrað .
SFX 413 0 oyrans .
SFX 413 0 oyranum .
SFX 413 0 oyrna .
SFX 413 0 oyrnanna .
SFX 413 0 oyru .
SFX 413 0 oyrum .
SFX 413 0 oyruni .
SFX 413 0 oyrunum .
SFX 413 0 oyrur .

#avynnuting
SFX 414 N 11
SFX 414 0 ting .
SFX 414 0 tinga .
SFX 414 0 tinganna .
SFX 414 0 tingi .
SFX 414 0 tingið .
SFX 414 0 tingini .
SFX 414 0 tinginum .
SFX 414 0 tings .
SFX 414 0 tingsins .
SFX 414 0 tingum .
SFX 414 0 tingunum .

#árabløðra
SFX 415 N 11
SFX 415 0 bløðra .
SFX 415 0 bløðran .
SFX 415 0 bløðranna .
SFX 415 0 bløðru .
SFX 415 0 bløðrum .
SFX 415 0 bløðruna .
SFX 415 0 bløðruni .
SFX 415 0 bløðrunnar .
SFX 415 0 bløðrunum .
SFX 415 0 bløðrur .
SFX 415 0 bløðrurnar .

#bógróður
SFX 416 N 4
SFX 416 0 ar .
SFX 416 0 arins .
SFX 416 0 i .
SFX 416 0 inum .

#arbeiðssetningur
SFX 417 N 15
SFX 417 0 setning .
SFX 417 0 setninga .
SFX 417 0 setninganna .
SFX 417 0 setningar .
SFX 417 0 setningarnar .
SFX 417 0 setningarnir .
SFX 417 0 setningi .
SFX 417 0 setningin .
SFX 417 0 setninginum .
SFX 417 0 setnings .
SFX 417 0 setningsins .
SFX 417 0 setningum .
SFX 417 0 setningunum .
SFX 417 0 setningur .
SFX 417 0 setningurin .
