utilities/dictionaries/fo_FO-Faroese.dic
av/1,262,124,285,353,423,456,171,265,341,169,319,322,428,185,401,217,300,148,235,195,410,114,280,167,307,176,258,186,324,412,251,251,97,104,182
avgerðar/1,388
avtalu/1,385,72
bóka/1,455,291,38,374,360,335,20,45,137,260,383,90,437,126,351,414,384,239
bókavarðarhjálpara/1,407
brenni/1,133,389,79,137,142,211,297,384
búk/442,445,181,207,195,49,176,216,289,272,382,7,22,346
burtur/1,205,123,456,342,428,412,379,386,97
dansi/1,282,123,51,431,279,343,31,387,316,184,89,70,239
dómara/1,309,385,209
dóms/1,75,20,106,102,313,414
driv/13,397,16,94
dropa/1,389,85
dýps/1,399
eftir/1,93,284,457,123,75,265,214,169,309,428,261,269,440,235,410,201,20,114,228,307,314,417,186,349,150,184,152,70,339,97,125
eina/1,218,328,388,89
einkar/1,314,383
eykaluta/1,384
ferðsluóhapp/400
fiskivinnupolitikk/392
floggløgg/396
forlov/1,6,299,411
frysti/1,384,50,360,391,176,95,160,459
fundarfrá/1,386
fyl/145,412,293
fylkis/1,402
gærd/1,395
gall/476,3,415,82,293,85
gásar/1,330,266,397,294,143,50,268,217,440,242
gjald/30,38,423,304,105,11,359,36,413,89,426
glym/1,406
gorr/390,6,22
gravløg/1,409
Grikkaland/393
gróðr/1,416
hall/476,8,6,170,4,11,394,166,502,55
háls/6,62,113,276,181,198,401,36,402,216,379,165,382,52,22
heima/1,111,205,448,179,38,306,128,51,143,171,265,50,112,86,318,153,192,380,328,45,45,230,161,226,388,417,131,60,225,150,184,70,381,369,104,160,363
hettu/1,389
heyst/10,6,111,38,92,431,378,11,343,153,12,148,333,450,387,95,379,414,100,274,209
himin/39,408,12
høvuðs/1,96,126,107,214,341,86,229,20,45,230,398,417,324,173,89,305,188,142,132,182,90,101,237,253,133,405,81,217,106,102,314,95,166
hvørsfals/1,405
inni/1,111,38,128,51,384,442,180,117,12,358,20,131,288,184,407,100,90
innspræningar/1,394
Ísland/393
javnsnøgg/396
kagga/1,403,200
kálv/1,50,4,23,368,412,293
kjallara/1,214,399
klipp/400,400,6,576,92,11,114
korn/10,44,170,430,285,81,431,172,45,394,167,391,176,379,189,188,22,384
kost/6,6,126,141,169,50,404,356,150,33,237
kota/1,444,382
krev/1,406
krónu/1,188,166,385
lær/10,3,124,488,276,181,23,401,217,164,148,20,272,195
læsi/1,394
landsdjóra/1,402
leygar/1,38,343,387,446
líkn/8,6,411,11
listafólka/1,414
livurkurr/390
lógar/1,124,214,90,126,45,106,398
lumma/1,96,397,389,361
lunga/1,77,415,446
lut/1,43,6,133,423,389,26,58,36,12,79,97
mál/1,6,6,62,113,179,284,274,353,133,92,405,139,354,204,141,342,23,37,319,36,36,235,79,20,340,137,49,106,413,334,439,349,199,407,362,89,447,190,101,249,107,417,222
miðgekk/392
minuløg/1,409
mosa/1,266,456,245,172,49,412,85,381,339,104
mót/13,10,6,262,254,284,353,133,259,141,214,4,138,261,36,207,79,20,49,230,417,186,386,97,158
munnlestr/1,416
navngreind/1,395
nótar/1,93,282,38,418,329,319,310,327,394,230,95
øl/13,8,206,198,317,289,89,389,384,383
ólas/1,413
ørindis/1,294,31,36,398
órøkju/1,83,408,60,101
ovndygg/396
pappírs/1,111,93,77,418,374,361,310,12,356,391,385
persóns/1,45,323,166,410
pjøpp/400
punds/1,385,131,363
rætti/1,12,402
randar/1,405
ríkdóms/1,384
rivja/1,113,77,401
romantikk/17,392
rossa/1,151,113,403,271,197,341,442,374,50,224,268,180,408,192,12,358,72,189
Sæland/393
sambindingareyka/1,417
sáttmálaupp/1,399,199
seingjar/1,62,448,326,50,180,31,178,413,173,337
sið/6,179,215,296,139,354,141,23,36,79,404,398,116,187,193,146,33
sjarr/390,6,22
sjóneyki/1,389
skitju/1,382
skørd/1,395
skruvu/1,412
skúlastjóra/1,407
spíssi/1,113,394
spreingisróðr/1,416
stinn/568,397,25,58,424
stut/1,381,80
summar/1,93,274,38,418,143,425,50,178,209,70,100,343,261,387
svart/403,143,264,433,263,317,289,473,211
svøvn/44,83,50,138,112,322,31,36,12,79,391,223,176,317,293,298,7
sýslu/1,20,414,329
tilveru/1,388
tøð/18,180,310,49,381
tortrygg/422,396
torvu/1,399
trekk/23,608,392,392
trúar/1,253,197,12,207,380,404,45,439,417,225,239,90
trygdarløg/1,398
tvarr/390,6,22
tvør/3,331,62,124,284,353,294,354,105,81,259,214,245,341,26,319,361,117,12,302,45,60,379,337,362,386,103,14,182,156
Týskland/393
uppboðs/1,383
úrklipp/400
útvarps/1,51,171,50,261,410,20,152,89,142,231,45
vág/547,547,415,16,79,362,7
vanærd/1,395
varma/1,404,89
vegløg/1,409
víkarskap/1,411
ym/1,406
yvirgangs/1,408,20,90,253
